Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,107
Animal Research and Diagnosis Revolving Fund; created.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Animal Research and Diagnosis Revolving Fund.

Laws 1976, LB 869, § 2.